Utah statutes.
13-20-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Consumer" means an individual who enters into an agreement or contract for the transfer, lease, purchase of a new motor vehicle other than for purposes of resale, or sublease during the duration of the period defined under Section 13-20-5.

(2)  "Manufacturer" means manufacturer, importer, distributor, or anyone who is named as the warrantor on an express written warranty on a motor vehicle.

(3)  "Motor home" means a self-propelled vehicular unit, primarily designed as a temporary dwelling for travel, recreational, and vacation use.

(4) (a)  "Motor vehicle" includes:

(i)  a motor home, as defined in this section, but only the self-propelled vehicle and chassis sold in this state;

(ii)  a motor vehicle, as defined in Section 41-1a-102, sold in this state; and

(iii)  a motorcycle, as defined in Section 41-1a-102, sold in this state if the motorcycle is designed primarily for use and operation on paved highways.

(b)  "Motor vehicle" does not include:

(i)  those portions of a motor home designated, used, or maintained primarily as a mobile dwelling, office, or commercial space;

(ii)  a road tractor or truck tractor as defined in Section 41-1a-102;

(iii)  a mobile home as defined in Section 41-1a-102;

(iv)  any motor vehicle with a gross laden weight of over 12,000 pounds, except:

(A)  a motor home as defined under Subsection (3); and

(B)  a farm tractor as defined in Section 41-1a-102;

(v)  a motorcycle, as defined in Section 41-1a-102, if the motorcycle is designed primarily for use or operation over unimproved terrain;

(vi)  an electric assisted bicycle as defined in Section 41-6a-102;

(vii)  a moped as defined in Section 41-6a-102;

(viii)  a motor assisted scooter as defined in Section 41-6a-102; or

(ix)  a motor-driven cycle as defined in Section 41-6a-102.

(5)  "Recreational vehicle trailer" means a travel trailer, camping trailer, or fifth wheel trailer.



Amended by Chapter 124, 2013 General Session

